Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-8-80.
Effect of sufficiency of the fund on payment of retirement benefits; order of liability for payment of benefits.

The state shall pay benefits under this chapter to all superior court judges who are eligible for retirement under this chapter without regard to the sufficiency of the fund to pay such benefits. Prior to any withdrawal against general funds of the state for payment of benefits, all interest and moneys earned and accumulated by investment pursuant to Code Section 47-8-4 shall be disbursed as benefits. The employee contributions paid by the employer to the fund on behalf of a judge of the superior courts, as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-8-44, after July 1, 1980, shall be considered to be payments made by the judge.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 362, § 16; Ga. L. 1964, p. 198, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, § 13.